Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.430

Primary. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Primary," for the purposes of RCW 29B.40.020, means the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.

[ 2024 c 164 s 243.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.